Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-1103
Rule 1103. Act, how cited.

These rules may be known and cited as the Nebraska Evidence Rules.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 73;

Laws 2009, LB97, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB881, § 5.